District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Autonomous Vehicle Testing Permit Requirement Congressional
Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Autonomous Vehicle Act of 2012, effective April 23, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-
278; D.C. Official Code § 50-2351 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 3a(d) (D.C. Official Code § 50-2352.01(d)) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) A person or entity shall not test or operate an autonomous vehicle on a District
roadway without an AV testing permit, unless the Department has not yet made an AV testing
permit application available and:
“(1) There is a test operator physically present in the vehicle who is performing
the dynamic driving task or is prepared to take over the dynamic driving task from the
autonomous driving system;
“(2) The person or entity is in compliance with other local and federal laws and
regulations; and
“(3) The person or entity provides the Department with electronic notification at
least 10 business days prior to commencing testing or operating in the District, including the
following information with respect to operations in the District, the:
“(A) Number of autonomous vehicles;
“(B) Model, make, and type of autonomous vehicles;
“(C) Operator training and license information;
“(D) Geographic testing or operation locations; and
“(E) Time period of testing or operation.”.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Section 3e (D.C. Official Code § 50-2352.05) is repealed.
(c) Section 3f(a)(1) (D.C. Official Code § 50-2352.06(a)(1)) is amended by striking the
phrase “An AV testing entity” and inserting the phrase “A person or entity” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in
section 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87
Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2